Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 12. Persons in Need of Guardianship
§ 3078.
Annual notice to person in need of guardianship.

The appointing court shall send an annual notice to each person under guardianship and the counsel of record of each person under guardianship, advising the person under guardianship of his or her right to file a motion for termination or modification of the guardianship pursuant to section 3077 of this title. The notice shall include a copy of any accountings, reports, or other information filed by the guardian during the year, except when there is counsel of record and the court deems it is in the best interests of the person under guardianship to send the accountings, reports, and other information to counsel only.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

1991, No. 38

, § 3;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3079.
Validity of prior guardianship.

All guardianships approved pursuant to section 2671 et seq. and section 2683 et seq. of this title prior to July 1, 1979 remain valid. On the first anniversary date of such guardianship after July 1, 1979, the court which approved such guardianship shall send notice to each person under guardianship, his or her counsel of record, and a near relative of the person under guardianship, if known, advising them of the right of the person under guardianship to petition for termination or modification of the guardianship pursuant to section 3077 of this title. Upon the filing of such a petition, the court shall promptly arrange for a comprehensive evaluation of the person under guardianship pursuant to section 3067 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15; amended

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3080.
Appeals.

Orders of the court issued pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter may be appealed in such manner as provided in

12 V.S.A. § 2551

et seq. and Rule 72, Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, provided, however, that any order issued pursuant to this subchapter shall not be stayed during the pendency of an appeal except by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 76

, § 15.

§ 3081.
Emergency temporary guardian pending final hearing on petition.

When a petition for guardianship has been filed, but adherence to the procedures set out in this subchapter would cause serious and irreparable harm to the respondent’s physical health or financial interests, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint an emergency temporary guardian prior to the final hearing and decision on the petition, subject to the requirements of this section.

If a guardianship petition is accompanied by a motion for emergency temporary guardianship, the court shall schedule a hearing on the appointment of an emergency temporary guardian for the earliest possible date. The court shall appoint counsel for the respondent and cause notice to be given as provided by the Vermont Rules of Probate Procedure (VRPP). Upon a showing by sworn affidavit that notice cannot be given within the time periods, in the manner, or to the persons required by the VRPP, the court may allow a hearing to go forward upon such notice as the court may direct. The court may appoint an emergency temporary guardian if it finds that serious and irreparable harm to the respondent’s physical health or financial interests will likely result during the pendency of the petition.

An emergency temporary guardian may be appointed without notice to the respondent or respondent’s counsel only if it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit or sworn testimony that immediate, serious, and irreparable harm will result to the respondent before the hearing on the appointment of an emergency temporary guardian can be held. A request for ex parte emergency temporary guardianship under this section shall be made by written motion, accompanied by a petition for guardianship, unless waived by the court for good cause shown. If the court appoints an ex parte emergency temporary guardian, the court shall immediately schedule a temporary hearing in accordance with subsection (b) of this section. The ex parte order shall state why the order was granted without notice and include findings on the immediate, serious, and irreparable harm. The ex parte order shall be for a fixed period of time, not to exceed 14 days, and shall expire on its terms unless extended after the temporary hearing. If the temporary hearing cannot be held before the ex parte order expires, the ex parte order can be extended for good cause shown for an additional 14 days until the temporary hearing is held.

A temporary guardianship order expires when the court renders a final decision on the guardianship petition. If the final decision is not rendered within 90 days of the filing of the petition, the court shall schedule a hearing to review the need for continuation of the temporary guardianship order.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 101

; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 162;

2007, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 11

, § 36.